Utah statutes.
59-2-704.   Assessment studies -- Sharing of data -- Factoring assessment
rates -- Corrective action.
(1)  Each year, to assist in the evaluation of appraisal performance of
taxable real property, the commission shall conduct and publish studies to
determine the relationship between the market value shown on the assessment
roll and the market value of real property in each county. The studies shall
include measurements of uniformity within counties and use statistical methods
established by the commission. County assessors may provide sales information
to the commission for purposes of the studies.  The commission shall make the
sales and appraisal information related to the studies available to the
assessors upon request.
(2)  The commission shall, each year, order each county to adjust or factor
its assessment rates using the most current studies so that the assessment
rate in each county is in accordance with that prescribed in Section 59-2-103.
The adjustment or factoring may include an entire county, geographical areas
within a county, and separate classes of properties. Where significant value
deviations occur, the commission shall also order corrective action.
(3)  If the commission determines that sales data in any county is
insufficient to perform the studies required under Subsection (1), the
commission may conduct appraisals of property within that county.
(4)  If a county fails to implement factoring or corrective action ordered
under Subsection (2), the commission shall:
(a)  implement the factoring or corrective action; and
(b)  charge 100% of the reasonable implementation costs to that county.
(5)  If a county disputes the factoring or corrective action ordered under
Subsection (2), the matter may be mediated by the Multicounty Appraisal Trust.
(6)  The commission may change the factor for any county which, after a
hearing before the commission, establishes that the factor should properly be
set at a different level for that county.  The commission shall establish the
method, procedure, and timetable for the hearings authorized under this
section, including access to information to ensure a fair hearing.  The
commission may establish rules to implement this section.
